Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 6. Suffrage and Elections

Suffrage

§ 1. Male and female citizens to enjoy equal rights.

The rights of citizens of the State of Wyoming to vote and hold office shall not be denied or abridged on account of sex. Both male and female citizens of this state shall equally enjoy all civil, political and religious rights and privileges.

Cross references. —

For provision that elections shall be free and equal, see art. 1, § 27, Wyo. Const.

As to qualifications of voters, see §§ 22-1-102(a)(xxvi) and

22-3-102

.

Husband and wife not single entity. —

At one time at common law, a husband and wife were possibly a single entity, both legally and practically; such is not true today. Coyne v. State, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979).

Women are men's equals before the law. —

The “equality” provisions of the constitution, this section and art. 1, § 3, Wyo. Const., emphasize the fact that women in Wyoming are men's equals before the law. State v. Yazzie, 67 Wyo. 256, 218 P.2d 482,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1950).

Civil rights enumerated. —

Civil rights mentioned in the constitution include the rights of property, marriage, protection by the laws, freedom of contracts, trial by jury, etc. Ward Terry & Co. v. Hensen, 75 Wyo. 444, 297 P.2d 213,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1956).

A wife has an interest in property held by her and her husband by the entirety,

and to say that she has no part in the control of it would be rather anomalous and contrary to the spirit if not the letter of this section. Ward Terry & Co. v. Hensen, 75 Wyo. 444, 297 P.2d 213,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1956).

Elective franchise. —

Any constitutional provision that excludes any class of citizens from the exercise of elective franchise should be strictly construed, to the end that none shall be held excluded who are not clearly designated. Rasmussen v. Baker, 7 Wyo. 117, 50 P. 819,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1897).

Women jurors. —

A male citizen, on a prosecution against him, cannot complain that women were excluded from the jury, since the right of women to sit as jurors, if it is a right, can only be asserted by a woman. McKinney v. State, 3 Wyo. 719, 30 P. 293,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1892).

Applied

in

Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004).

Cited

in

State v. Rosachi, 549 P.2d 318,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1976).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State civil rights legislation prohibiting sex discrimination in housing, 81 ALR4th 205.

Sex discrimination in law enforcement and corrections employment, 53 ALR Fed 31.

Application of Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 USC § 1681 et seq.) to sex discrimination in educational employment, 54 ALR Fed 522.

Sex discrimination in United States armed forces, 56 ALR Fed 850.

What constitutes termination of employee due to pregnancy in violation of Pregnancy Discrimination Act amendment to Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USCS § 2000e(k)), 130 ALR Fed 473.

§ 2. Qualifications of electors.

Every citizen
of the United States of the age of twenty-one years and upwards, who
has resided in the state or territory one year and in the county wherein
such residence is located sixty days next preceding any election,
shall be entitled to vote at such election, except as herein otherwise
provided.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning qualifications of voters, see §§ 22-1-102(a)(xxvi) and

22-3-102

.

Minimum voting age has been lowered to 18

by the twenty-sixth amendment to the United States constitution.Delgiorno v. Huisman, 498 P.2d 1246,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1972).

Residence requirements. —

Requirements in the state constitution and state laws for a durational residence of 1 year in the state, and residence in excess of 30 days in the county as a precondition for voting are repugnant to the fourteenth amendment of the United States constitution.Delgiorno v. Huisman, 498 P.2d 1246,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1972).

In light of present constitutional and statutory provisions, election officials may require as a precondition for registering that a voter will have been a resident of the county for 30 days immediately preceding the primary or general election. Delgiorno v. Huisman, 498 P.2d 1246,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1972).

A requirement that a voter be a resident of the precinct wherein he may offer to vote for at least 10 days is constitutional. Delgiorno v. Huisman, 498 P.2d 1246,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1972).

Language requirement. —

Only those who could read the constitution in the English language were entitled to vote under the provisions of the constitution. Rasmussen v. Baker, 7 Wyo. 117, 50 P. 819,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1897).

Tax requirements held unconstitutional. —

Statute providing that only taxpayers may vote at bond elections is unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

Statute requiring evidence of payment of realty tax as additional qualification for voting on questions of school tax appropriations and bonds was unconstitutional.
West v. School Dist., 37 Wyo. 36, 258 P. 583,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1927).

Property ownership requirement. —

Law providing for election on school bond issues where property and nonproperty owners may vote did not violate constitutional provisions regarding electors or elections for the creation of debts.
State ex rel. Voiles v. Johnson County High Sch., 43 Wyo. 494, 5 P.2d 255,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1931).

Constitutional amendment elections. —

Article 20, § 1, Wyo. Const., requiring “a majority of the electors” to ratify an amendment to the constitution, requires a majority of the electors to adopt an amendment, and not merely a majority of those actually voting thereon; the word “electors” meaning as defined by this section, those entitled to vote, and the word “ratify” meaning to affirm. State ex rel. Blair v. Brooks, 17 Wyo. 344, 99 P. 874,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1909).

Applied

in

Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004).

Cited

in

State ex rel. White v. Hathaway, 478 P.2d 56,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1970);
Maxfield v. State, 2013 WY 14,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2013).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Loyalty Oath for Candidates,” see 5 Wyo. L.J. 146.

For note dealing with the effect of residence laws on elections, see 12 Wyo. L.J. 50 (1957).

§ 3. Electors privileged from arrest.

Electors shall in all cases except treason, felony or breach of the peace, be privileged from arrest on the days of election during their attendance at elections, and going to and returning therefrom.

§ 4. Exemption of electors from military duty.

No elector shall be obliged to perform militia duty on the day of election, except in time of war or public danger.

Cross references. —

As to state militia, see art. 17, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const.

As to militia generally, see title 19.

§ 5. Electors must be citizens of United States.

No person
shall be deemed a qualified elector of this state, unless such person
be a citizen of the United States.

Cross references. —

As to alien suffrage, see § 10 of this article.

For other provisions requiring electors to be citizens of the United States, see §

22-3-102

.

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Keefe v. McInerney, 63 Wyo. 280, 182 P.2d 28,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1947);
Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1909);
Maxfield v. State, 2013 WY 14,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2013).

§ 6. What persons excluded from franchise.

All persons adjudicated to be mentally incompetent or persons convicted of felonies, unless restored to civil rights, are excluded from the elective franchise. (As amended by Laws 1996, House Joint Resolution No. 4.)

Cross references. —

See also § 22-1-102(a)(xxvi).

Convicted felon may run for office. —

This section and §

6-10-106

provide that a person who has been convicted of a felony is prohibited from holding public office. They do not say such person is prohibited from running for office. Hamburg v. State, 820 P.2d 523,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. Dec. 4, 1991).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Keefe v. McInerney, 63 Wyo. 280, 182 P.2d 28,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1947); Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Loyalty Oath for Candidates,” see 5 Wyo. L.J. 146.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Voting rights of persons mentally incapacitated, 80 ALR3d 1116.

§ 7. When residence not lost by reason of absence.

No elector shall be deemed to have lost his residence in the state, by reason of his absence on business of the United States, or of this state, or in the military or naval service of the United States.

Cross references. —

As to absentee voting, see § 22 of this article and ch. 9 of title 22.

Quoted

in

Karn v. Hayes, 530 P.2d 156,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 8. Soldiers stationed in state not considered residents.

No soldier, seaman, or marine in the army or navy of the United States shall be deemed a resident of this state in consequence of his being stationed therein.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Residence and Settlement Laws, Their Effect on Elections, Welfare, and the Right of Free Movement,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 50 (1957).

§ 9. Educational qualifications of electors.

No person shall have the right to vote who shall not be able to read the constitution of this state. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any person prevented by physical disability from complying with its requirements.

Cross references. —

For provision that literacy tests shall not be imposed as a condition to voting in any election, see § 22-1-102(a)(xxvi).

Language requirement. —

Only those who could read the constitution in the English language were entitled to vote under the provisions of the constitution. Rasmussen v. Baker, 7 Wyo. 117, 50 P. 819,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1897).

Debates before the constitutional convention were not conclusive of an intention of the convention, or of the people voting for the constitution, that those who could read the constitution only when translated into a foreign language should be entitled to vote, especially where the debates indicated that some members of the convention had a contrary intention. Rasmussen v. Baker, 7 Wyo. 117, 50 P. 819,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1897).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Keefe v. McInerney, 63 Wyo. 280, 182 P.2d 28,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1947); Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Loyalty Oath for Candidates,” see 5 Wyo. L.J. 146.

For note, “The Common-Law Rule Against Holding Incompatible Offices — Abolishing the ‘Office’ Limitation. Haskins v. State ex rel. Harrington, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

, 70 A.L.R.3d 1171 (Wyo. 1973),” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 667 (1974).

§ 10. Alien suffrage.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed to deprive any person of the right to vote who has such right at the time of the adoption of this constitution, unless disqualified by the restrictions of section six of this article. After the expiration of five (5) years from the time of the adoption of this constitution, none but citizens of the United States shall have the right to vote.

Cross references. —

For other provisions requiring electors to be citizens of United States, see art. 6, § 5,Wyo. Const., § 22-1-102(a)(xxvi) and §

22-3-102

.

Language requirement. —

Only those who could read the constitution in the English language were entitled to vote under the provisions of the constitution. Rasmussen v. Baker, 7 Wyo. 117, 50 P. 819,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1897).

§ 11. Manner of holding elections.

All elections shall be by ballot. The legislature shall provide by law that the names of all candidates for the same office, to be voted for at any election, shall be printed on the same ballot, at public expense, and on election day be delivered to the voters within the polling place by sworn public officials, and only such ballots so delivered shall be received and counted. But no voter shall be deprived the privilege of writing upon the ballot used the name of any other candidate. All voters shall be guaranteed absolute privacy in the preparation of their ballots, and the secrecy of the ballot shall be made compulsory.

Cross references. —

As to ballots generally, see ch. 6 of title 22.

As to absentee voting, see ch. 9 of title 22.

As to polling place regulations during voting hours, see ch. 13 of title 22.

Legislature may prescribe method of writing in. —

The legislature's right to prescribe by general law the method in which the privilege of writing in shall be exercised is not questioned by the supreme court. Fisher v. Clissold, 398 P.2d 553,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1965).

Waiver of secrecy. —

Voter, if he so desires, may waive privilege of secrecy. Hamilton v. Marshall, 41 Wyo. 157, 282 P. 1058,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1929).

Voter shall not be disfranchised by mistake of election officers. —

It is in keeping with the constitutional mandate to follow the general rule that a voter shall not be disfranchised or deprived of his rights as an elector by the mistake of election officers, if it is possible to prevent it. Fisher v. Clissold, 398 P.2d 553,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1965).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Loyalty Oath for Candidates,” see 5 Wyo. L.J. 146.

§ 12. Registration of voters required.

No person qualified to be an elector of the State of Wyoming, shall be allowed to vote at any general or special election hereafter to be holden in the state, until he or she shall have registered as a voter according to law, unless the failure to register is caused by sickness or absence, for which provisions shall be made by law. The legislature of the state shall enact such laws as will carry into effect the provisions of this section, which enactment shall be subject to amendment, but shall never be repealed; but this section shall not apply to the first election held under this constitution.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning voter registration, see ch. 3 of title 22.

Section not violated. —

The failure of the legislature to provide in ch. 17, Laws 1950, for a special registration for a special election on issuance of bonds by an improvement district did not contravene this section. In re West Highway Sanitary & Improvement Dist., 77 Wyo. 384, 317 P.2d 495,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1957).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Keefe v. McInerney, 63 Wyo. 280, 182 P.2d 28,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1947); Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

School Dist. v. Cook, 424 P.2d 751,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1967).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Administrative Law — Initiative and Referendum. Initiative Petitions in Wyoming — The Presumption of Validity and the Secretary of State's Review. Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 857 (1983).

Elections

§ 13. Purity of elections to be provided for.

The legislature shall pass laws to secure the purity of elections, and guard against abuses of the elective franchise.

Cross references. —

For regulation of campaign practices, see chapter 25 of title 22.

For other offenses and penalties, see ch. 26 of title 22.

Quoted

in

Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Actionability, under 42 USC § 1983, of claim arising out of maladministration of election, 66 ALR Fed 750.

§ 14. Election contests.

The legislature shall, by general law, designate the courts by which the several classes of election contests not otherwise provided for, shall be tried, and regulate the manner of trial and all matters incident thereto; but no such law shall apply to any contest arising out of an election held before its passage.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning election contests, see chapter 17 of title 22.

Amendment of petition. —

New and separate causes of contest set forth in an amended petition are barred where the amendment was not filed within the time required by statute for instituting election contests. Turner v. Hamilton, 13 Wyo. 408, 80 P. 664,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1905).

§ 15. Qualifications for office.

No person
except a qualified elector shall be elected or appointed to any civil
or military office in the state. “Military office” shall
be limited to the offices of adjutant general, assistant adjutant
general for the army national guard and assistant adjutant general
for the air national guard. (As amended by Laws 1999, Senate Joint
Resolution No. 3, § 1.)

Cross references. —

As to qualified electors, see §§ 22-1-102(a)(xxvi) and

22-3-102

.

Amendments. —

Laws 1999, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, § 1, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment of this section, which was approved by vote of the people at the general election held November 7, 2000, and declared in effect November 15, 2000.

The 1999 amendment added the second sentence.

Laws 2000, House Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 1, § 1, repealed Laws 1999, Senate Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 2, which proposed an identical amendment to the amendment proposed to this section by Laws 1999, Senate Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 3.

Assistant adjutant generals. —

State of Wyoming's newly enacted residency requirement for the position of assistant adjutant general (AAG) of the Wyoming national guard violates the Privileges and Immunities Clause, and consequently, removal of two officers from their positions as AAGs violated the United States Constitution, for which the proper remedy was reinstatement. Nelson v. Geringer, 295 F.3d 1082, 2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 13267 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2002).

City manager. —

Since the position of city manager is an “office” within meaning of this section, a provision that he need not be a qualified elector “of the municipality or of this state” is invalid. State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1923).

Applied

in

Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004).

Quoted

in

Crawford v. City of Sheridan, 392 P.2d 519,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 16. When officers to hold over; suspension of officers.

Every person holding any civil office under the state or any municipality therein shall, unless removed according to law, exercise the duties of such office until his successor is duly qualified, but this shall not apply to members of the legislature, nor to members of any board or assembly, two or more of whom are elected at the same time. The legislature may by law provide for suspending any officer in his functions, pending impeachment or prosecution for misconduct in office.

Cross references. —

As to authority of governor to suspend officer pending impeachment, see §

9-1-203

.

As to suspension of governor pending impeachment, see §

9-1-214

.

Words “civil office under the state”

import an office in which is reposed some portion of the sovereign power of the state, and, of necessity, having some connection with the legislative, judicial or executive department of the government. Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

Justices of the peace are civil officers under the state

within the meaning of this section, and are entitled to hold office until their successors qualify. Ballantyne v. Bower, 17 Wyo. 356, 99 P. 869,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1909).

Members of livestock and sanitary board hold civil office under state

and hold their offices for 6 years and until their successors are appointed and have qualified. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

State engineer appointed to fill vacancy

is entitled to hold office until the appointment and qualification of a successor. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

When vacancy exists. —

Under this provision there is no vacancy in office, so as to enable governor to appoint successor without consent of senate, so long as a qualified person is in possession of the office. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Under statute providing term of office shall be 6 years and “until successors are appointed and qualified,” no vacancy in office exists enabling governor to appoint successor without consent of senate while qualified person is in possession of office. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Right to hold over. —

Where appointment to public office by governor is not confirmed by senate as required by statute, appointment is ineffective and invalid, and incumbent may hold over until his successor is properly appointed and confirmed. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

“Successor” defined. —

“Successor” held to mean one legally chosen. Ballantyne v. Bower, 17 Wyo. 356, 99 P. 869,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1909).

Death of hold-over member. —

Where governor's appointment of new member to livestock and sanitary board was invalid because not confirmed by senate, death of hold-over member created vacancy which governor could fill by appointment, with new appointee standing in shoes of deceased. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Abandonment. —

Failure of incumbents to bring quo warranto until eight months after invalid appointments of new board members and after annual meeting did not show loss of offices by “abandonment.” People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Where governor's appointment to public office was invalid because there was no vacancy, but the old officer acquiesced in governor's appointee occupying his office, the former abandoned and vacated office and new appointee stood in his shoes as hold-over incumbent. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Acquiescence. —

Where former member of livestock and sanitary board acquiesced in appointment of successor for more than two and 1/2 years, he lost all rights to office which he might otherwise have had as hold-over incumbent. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Prospective appointments. —

Mere fact term of office of livestock and sanitary board member did not expire until after adjournment of legislature did not prevent prospective appointment followed by concurrence by senate. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Effect of governor's failure to send name of appointee to legislature. —

Where a statute provided that a vacancy in the office of state examiner should be filled by appointment by the governor until the next meeting of the legislature, and upon the resignation of the state examiner the governor appointed a person to fill the vacancy, but did not send the name of the appointee or of any other person to the next session of the legislature for confirmation, the person so appointed held over under this section, and no vacancy thereafter existed which could be filled by appointment. State ex rel. Richardson v. Henderson, 4 Wyo. 535, 35 P. 517,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1894).

Governor's neglect to send name of appointee to senate did not deprive him of the power thereafter to appoint. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

§ 17. Time of holding general and special elections; when elected officers to enter upon duties.

All general elections for state and county officers, for members of the house of representatives and the senate of the State of Wyoming, and representatives to the congress of the United States, shall be held on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November of each even year. Special elections may be held as now, or may hereafter be provided by law. All state and county officers elected at a general election shall enter upon their respective duties on the first Monday in January next following the date of their election, or as soon thereafter as may be possible.

Cross references. —

For another provision establishing the date of general elections, see §

22-2-104

.

For another provision concerning when elected county and state officers assume their duties, see §

22-2-107

.

Eligibility to office is a continuing requirement,

and an officer who is qualified at the time of the election but who is not qualified at the time of the commencement of his term cannot hold the office. State ex rel. Willis v. Larson, 539 P.2d 352,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1975).

Person elected to office entitled to full term. —

Where term of elective office is fixed by constitution or statute without time being established for its beginning or ending, a person elected to office is entitled to hold for the period established as full term, whether elected upon happening of a casual vacancy or at expiration of a complete term. State ex rel. Irvine v. Brooks, 14 Wyo. 393, 84 P. 488,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1906).

Term of state treasurer where elected after appointment to fill vacancy. —

Where a person appointed to fill a vacancy in the office of state treasurer is afterward elected to the office at a general election held before the term of his predecessor would have expired, he is not entitled to hold the office for 4 years after such election, but only for the remainder of his predecessor's term. State ex rel. Irvine v. Brooks, 14 Wyo. 393, 84 P. 488,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1906).

Person elected to fill a vacancy in the office of governor

on Tuesday next after the first Monday of November, 1892, was elected at a general election. In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1893).

District judges may be elected at any general election

where a vacancy will exist before the next general election. State ex rel. Burdick v. Schnitger, 17 Wyo. 65, 96 P. 238,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1908).

Justices of the peace are county officers

and their terms of office, when elected at a general election, commence on the first Monday of the following January. Ballantyne v. Bower, 17 Wyo. 356, 99 P. 869,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1909).

§ 18. Method of selecting officers whose election is not provided for.

All officers, whose election is not provided for in this constitution, shall be elected or appointed as may be directed by law.

State engineer appointed to fill a vacancy

is entitled to hold office until a new appointment is made and has been confirmed. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

Judges of the district court elected at general elections

are entitled to hold office for the full term of six years. State ex rel. Burdick v. Schnitger, 17 Wyo. 65, 96 P. 238,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1908).

Effect of military service. —

A district judge who during term of office, entered the service of the United States as a major in advocate general's department, upon returning to and resuming the office of district judge, was a de jure and not a de facto judge, where he had not resigned and his office had not been declared vacant and no successor had qualified. State ex rel. Raymond v. Jefferis, 26 Wyo. 115, 178 P. 909,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1919).

§ 19. Dual office holding.

No member of congress from this state, nor any person holding or exercising any office or appointment of trust or profit under the United States, shall at the same time hold or exercise any office in this state to which a salary, fees or perquisites shall be attached. The legislature may by law declare what offices are incompatible.

Special prosecutor. —

In a defendant's murder case, there was nothing in the record to suggest that the presence of an Assistant United States Attorney, who had been appointed as a special prosecutor, affected the trial proceedings in any manner so as to impede the defendant's right to a fair trial, where the defendant offered only unsupported allegations. Belden v. State, 2003 WY 89, 73 P.3d 1041,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. Aug. 26, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1165, 124 S. Ct. 1179, 157 L. Ed. 2d 1212, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 898 (U.S. 2004).

Cited

in

Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and effect of state statutes restricting political activities of public officers or employees, 51 ALR4th 702.

§ 20. Oath of office; form.

Senators and representatives and all judicial, state and county officers shall, before entering on the duties of their respective offices, take and subscribe the following oath or affirmation: “I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support, obey and defend the constitution of the United States, and the constitution of the state of Wyoming; that I have not knowingly violated any law related to my election or appointment, or caused it to be done by others; and that I will discharge the duties of my office with fidelity.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, approved March 1, 2007, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment of this section, which was approved by vote of the people at the general election held November 4, 2008, and certified November 12, 2008.

The 2008 amendment clarified and modernized the oath of office taken by all elected and appointed officials of whom the oath is required.

Cited

in

Scott v. Ward, 49 Wyo. 243, 54 P.2d 805,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(1936).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Loyalty Oath for Candidates,” see 5 Wyo. L.J. 146.

For article, “No Home On the Range for Home Rule,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 791 (1996).

§ 21. Oath of office; how administered.

The foregoing oath shall be administered by some person authorized to administer oaths, and in the case of state officers and judges of the supreme court shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state, and in the case of other judicial and county officers in the office of the clerk of the county in which the same is taken; any person refusing to take said oath or affirmation shall forfeit his office, and any person who shall be convicted of having sworn or affirmed falsely, or of having violated said oath or affirmation, shall be guilty of perjury, and be forever disqualified from holding any office of trust or profit within this state. The oath to members of the senate and house of representatives shall be administered by one of the judges of the supreme court or a justice of the peace, in the hall of the house to which the members shall be elected.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

and notes thereunder.

Nature of duties imposed by law. —

When duties are imposed upon a public officer, such as a county clerk, by law rather than by some appointing power, such duties are usually governmental and not ministerial. Denver Buick v. Pearson, 465 P.2d 512,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1970).

Cited

in

Scott v. Ward, 49 Wyo. 243, 54 P.2d 805,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(1936).

§ 22. Absent voter ballots, voting and registration.

The provisions of section 11 of article 6 of this constitution, which provides that the ballots therein mentioned shall be delivered on election day to the voters within the polling place by sworn public officials, and that only such ballots so delivered shall be received and counted, shall not be applicable to, affect or invalidate absent voter ballots and voting thereof and registration therefor, as provided by article 14, of chapter 36, Wyoming Revised Statutes, 1931, and other acts of the legislature of the State of Wyoming, amendatory thereof or related thereto, whether heretofore or hereafter enacted. (As added by Laws 1944, Sp. Sess., ch. 3.)

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning absentee voting, see chapter 9 of title 22.

Editor's notes. —

This article as adopted was in 2 subdivisions. The first was headed “Suffrage” and consisted of 12 sections numbered from 1 to 12. The second subdivision was headed “Elections” and consisted of 9 sections numbered from 1 to 9. In printing the constitution the sections in the second subdivision were renumbered consecutively with those sections in the first subdivision.